Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1831.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 7518. Wearing masks on public property prohibited.(a) Prohibition.--Except as provided under subsection (c), a person may not enter or appear upon or within public property in this Commonwealth while wearing a mask or other device designed to conceal the person's face, voice or identity.(b) Grading.--An offense under subsection (a) constitutes a misdemeanor of the third degree.(c) Applicability.--The prohibition under subsection (a) shall not apply to any of the following:(1) A person wearing a traditional holiday costume.(2) A person engaged in a trade or employment where a 123456789101112131415161718 mask is worn for the purpose of ensuring the person's safety or due to the nature of the person's occupation or trade.(3) A person using a mask in a theatrical production.(4) A person wearing a mask or other device for a religious purpose.(5) A person engaged in a parade, ritual, initiation, ceremony, celebration or similar type of gathering or event and wearing or using in any manner a costume, disguise, facial makeup, mask or similar device if the person receives the necessary permission as required by statute, if applicable, prior to the gathering or event.(6) A person wearing a medical or surgical grade mask for the purpose of preventing the spread of contagious disease.(7) A person wearing a mask for the purpose of protecting the person's head or face when operating a motorcycle.(d) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit, replace or conflict with available protections or remedies under the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-336, 104 Stat. 327) or any other applicable Federal or State law.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1831PN2426 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223